kor.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for kor

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<adj%> ! Adjective
%<adv%> ! Adverb
%<det%> ! Determiner
%<prn%> ! Pronoun
%<np%>  ! Proper Name
%<adv%> ! Adverb
%<post%> ! Particle
%<ij%>  ! Interjection
%<num%> ! Numeral
%<vadj%> ! Verbal Adjective
%<vn%>  ! Verbal Noun
%<prf%> ! Pre-Suffix
%<psf%> ! Post-suffix
%<csfcoo%> ! Coordinating Conjunction
%<csfsub%> ! Subordinating Conjunction

!
%<pass%> ! Passive 

!negative
%<neg%> ! negative 

! Tense - Verb Pre suffix
%<pres%> ! Present
%<past%> ! Past

! Mode -  Verb Post suffix
%<aff%> ! Affirmative
%<itg%> ! Interrogative
%<neg%> ! Negative
%<imp%> ! Imperative
%<dec%> ! Declarative
%<inj%> ! Injunctive

! Politness
%<fam%> ! familiar
%<hon%> ! Honorific

! Case - Particle
%<nom%> ! Nominative
%<acc%> ! Accusative
%<gen%> ! Genitive
%<dat%> ! Dative
%<loc%> ! Locative
%<ins%> ! Instrumental
%<com%> ! Comitative
%<top%> ! Topic
%<add%> ! Additive
%<con%> ! Conjunctive
%<tra%> ! Transitive

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<ct%>  ! Counting units
%<ord%> ! Ordinal
%<ctn%> ! Counting numbers

!Animacy(for nouns)
%<aa%> ! Animate
%<an%> ! Animate or Inanimate
%<nn%> ! Inanimate

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary

! Punctuation
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 

! Chars
ㄱ !
ㄴ !
ㄷ !
ㄹ !
ㅁ !
ㅂ !
ㅅ !
ㅇ !
ㅈ !
ㅊ !
ㅋ !
ㅌ !
ㅍ !
ㅎ !
ㄲ !
ㄸ !
ㅃ !
ㅆ !
ㅉ !
ㅏ !
ㅑ !
ㅓ !
ㅕ !
ㅗ !
ㅛ !
ㅜ !
ㅠ !
ㅡ !
ㅣ !
ㅐ !
ㅒ !
ㅔ !
ㅖ !
ㅘ !
ㅙ !
ㅚ !
ㅝ !
ㅞ !
ㅟ !
ㅢ !
ㄳ !
ㄵ !
ㄶ !
ㄺ !
ㄻ !
ㄼ !
ㄽ !
ㄾ !
ㄿ !
ㅀ !
ㅄ !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 
Verbs ;
Punctuation ; 

LEXICON N1 

%<n%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:ㄷㅓㄹ # ;
%<n%>%<top%>:ㄴㅡㄴ # ;
%<n%>%<pres%>:ㅇㅣㄷㅏ # ;

LEXICON V1 

%<v%>: # ;
#%<v%>%<pres%>:ㄷㅏ # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:ㅇㅣㄷㅏ # ;

LEXICON Nouns

아바지:ㅇㅏㅂㅏㅈㅣ N1 ; !
아:ㅇㅏ N1 ; !
차:ㅊㅏ N1 ; !
사람:ㅅㅏㄹㅏㅁ N1 ; !
나:ㄴㅏ N1 ; !
도준:ㄷㅗㅈㅜㄴ N1 ; !
길:ㄱㅣㄹ N1 ; !

LEXICON Verbs

살:ㅅㅏㄹ V1 ; !

LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
